Idaho, session 2025, H0189.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 59-502, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
59-502. SALARIES OF JUDGES. (1) Commencing on July 1, 2024, the
The salary of the justices of the supreme court shall be one hundred
sixty-nine thousand five hundred eight dollars ($169,508) one hundred
seventy-nine thousand eight hundred thirty-four dollars ($179,834) per an-
num. Commencing on July 1, 2026, the salary of the justices of the supreme
court shall be one hundred ninety thousand eight hundred eighty-two dollars
($190,882) per annum. Commencing on July 1, 2027, the salary of the justices
of the supreme court shall be two hundred two thousand seven hundred four
dollars ($202,704) per annum. Commencing on July 1, 2028, the salary of the
justices of the supreme court shall be two hundred fifteen thousand three
hundred fifty-three dollars ($215,353) per annum.
(2) Commencing on July 1, 2023, judges of the court of appeals shall re-
ceive an annual salary in an amount of eight thousand dollars ($8,000) less
than the annual salary of a supreme court justice.
(3) Commencing on July 1, 2017, district judges shall receive an an-
nual salary in an amount of six thousand dollars ($6,000) less than the an-
nual salary of a judge of the court of appeals.
(4) Commencing on July 1, 2023, magistrate judges shall receive an an-
nual salary in an amount of eight thousand dollars ($8,000) less than the an-
nual salary of a district judge.
(5) Salaries shall be paid on regular pay periods not less frequently
than monthly as determined by order of the supreme court as due out of the
state treasury, but no justice of the supreme court or judge of the district
court or magistrate shall be paid his salary, or any part thereof, unless
he shall first take and subscribe an oath that there is not in his hands any
matter in controversy not decided by him that has been finally submitted for
his consideration and determination thirty (30) days prior to his taking and
subscribing said oath.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.